Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.216

Department inspection—City sealer—Fees.

The department must biennially inspect and test the secondary weights and measures standards of any city having a city sealer appointed under this chapter and must issue an official seal of approval for the same when found to be correct. The department must, by rule, establish a reasonable fee for this and any other inspection and testing services performed by the department's metrology laboratory.

[ 2019 c 96 s 6; 1995 c 355 s 10; 1992 c 237 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.